Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2102XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 86 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and distribute to school 3 districts a model application and selection process for the 4 position of student liaison that is required to be appointed 5 to the board of directors of a school district pursuant 6 to section 279.3, subsection 2. The model application and 7 selection process shall contain examples of the applications 8 and selection processes used by school districts to include a 9 student liaison or other student representative on the school 10 districtâs board of directors. 11 Sec. 2. Section 279.3, Code 2025, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 279.3 Appointment of secretary and treasurer ââ student 14 liaison . 15 1. a. The board shall appoint a secretary who shall not be 16 a teacher employed by the board but may be another employee of 17 the board. The board shall also appoint a treasurer who may be 18 another employee of the board. However, the board may appoint 19 one person to serve as the secretary and the treasurer. 20 2. b. These officers shall be appointed from outside the 21 membership of the board and the appointment and qualification 22 shall be entered of record in the minutes of the secretary. 23 They shall qualify within ten days following appointment by 24 taking the oath of office in the manner required by section 25 277.28 and filing a bond or obtaining an insurance policy as 26 required by section 291.2 and shall hold office until their 27 successors are appointed and qualified. 28 2. a. The board shall develop and implement an application 29 and selection process for the position of student liaison, 30 who shall act as a liaison between the board, administrators, 31 teachers, the student council, and the general student 32 population. If an applicant for student liaison satisfies the 33 boardâs application and selection process, the board shall 34 select at least one applicant to act as a student liaison. 35 -1- LSB 2102XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 86 b. The student liaison shall have a seat at the table 1 of all regular meetings of the board and board subcommittee 2 meetings in a nonvoting capacity, and shall have access to all 3 nonconfidential board meeting materials. The student liaison 4 may advocate for student interests in regular meetings of the 5 board, provide school administrators and board members with 6 student viewpoints, assist in developing and monitoring the 7 implementation of education policy, and volunteer to perform 8 other functions of benefit to the students and the district 9 that the board deems appropriate for a student to carry out. 10 c. The student liaison shall not do any of the following: 11 (1) Participate in special meetings of the board. 12 (2) Be involved in board meetings related to the discipline 13 of employees of the school district or students enrolled in the 14 school district. 15 (3) Have access to documents involving the discipline of 16 employees of the school district or students enrolled in the 17 school district. 18